Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1903
Bed-hold day, defined.

Bed-hold day
means a day during which a bed is kept open pursuant to the bed-hold policy
of the nursing facility or skilled nursing facility which permits a resident
to return to the facility and resume residence in the facility after a transfer
to a hospital or therapeutic leave.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 3.